Maryland, session 2026, SB0617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
[13–237.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Own” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State Government
Article.
(3) “Video lottery facility” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01 of the State
Government Article.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0617*

SENATE BILL 617
(4) “Video lottery operation license” has the meaning stated in § 9–1A–01
of the State Government Article.
(b) This section applies to the following persons:
(1) an applicant for a video lottery operation license;
(2) a holder of a video lottery operation license; or
(3) a person who owns an interest in the operation of a video lottery facility
in this State.
(c) This section does not apply to gaming activity that an eligible organization is
authorized to conduct under the Criminal Law Article.
(d) A person subject to this section may not, directly or indirectly, make a
contribution to:
(1) the campaign finance entity of a candidate for any nonfederal public
office in the State; or
(2) any other campaign finance entity organized in support of a candidate
for any nonfederal public office in the State.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.